California, session 20252026, AB1382.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 122325) is added to Part 6 of Division 105 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: CHAPTER 6.5. Ethics Over Aesthetics Act122325. This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Ethics Over Aesthetics Act.122325.2. For purposes of this chapter, all of the following definitions apply:(a) “Cosmetic transgenic trait” means a transgenic trait that alters, modifies, or engineers a transgenic pet animal’s appearance or natural functions, which may include, but not be limited to, novel fur, skin, feather, or scale coloring, the removal of claws or vocal cords, or the addition or subtraction of appendages.(b) “Pet animal” means a dog, cat, rabbit, guinea pig, hamster, mouse, reptile, amphibian, bird, fish, or other species of animal kept for the purpose of being a household pet.(c) “Transgenic pet animal” means a pet animal that possesses a transgenic trait, and includes the progeny of a transgenic pet animal.(d) “Transgenic trait” means a trait that has been deliberately altered, modified, or engineered, through means not possible under natural conditions, by insertion of a foreign gene using genetic engineering methods, including, but not limited to, the introduction of chromosomes containing artificially transferred genetic material from any other organism or a laboratory construct, regardless of whether the original source’s genetic material was altered, modified, or engineered before insertion, or whether the originally transferred genetic material was inherited through normal reproduction.122325.4. (a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a person shall not import for profit, sell, or offer for sale in this state a transgenic pet animal that possesses a cosmetic transgenic trait.(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to a transgenic pet animal if any of the following apply:(A) The transgenic trait is for the sole purpose of benefiting the health of the transgenic pet animal, including, but not limited to, making the transgenic pet animal resistant to a disease or condition.(B) The transgenic trait is for the sole purpose of enhancing the transgenic pet animal’s interaction with humans, including, but not limited to, promoting hypoallergenic traits, and does not alter the natural functions of the transgenic pet animal.(C)The transgenic pet animal is of an aquatic pet animal species produced through breeding, conjugation, fermentation, hybridization, in vitro fertilization, or tissue culture, and no transgenic organisms are involved.(D)The transgenic pet animal is of an aquatic pet animal species produced through whole genome ploidy manipulation.(C) The transgenic pet animal is of a fish species that satisfies the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 1.92 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.(b) Each transgenic pet animal imported for profit, sold, or offered for sale in this state in violation of this section shall be a separate violation and shall be punishable by a civil penalty of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000). An action to enforce this section may be brought by the district attorney of the county in which the violation occurred or by the city attorney of the city in which the violation occurred. The civil penalty shall be paid to the city or county, as applicable, of the attorney that brings the action.